Idaho, session 2025, H0439.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Administration the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Permanent Building
Fund $34,400 $4,400 $60,600 $99,400
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 30,600 7,200 37,800
Employee Group Insurance
Fund 11,500 0 0 11,500
TOTAL $76,500 $11,600 $60,600 $148,700
II. PUBLIC WORKS:
FROM:
Permanent Building
Fund $143,900 $143,900
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 31,700 17,100 48,800
TOTAL $175,600 $17,100 $192,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. PURCHASING:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $7,200 $7,200
Federal Surplus Property Revolving
Fund 4,400 4,400
TOTAL $11,600 $11,600
IV. INSURANCE MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Employee Group Insurance
Fund $63,100 $7,200 $70,300
Retained Risk
Fund 69,300 14,400 83,700
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 0 1,400 1,400
TOTAL $132,400 $23,000 $155,400
V. DOCUMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $10,100 $33,000 $43,100
GRAND TOTAL $208,900 $231,900 $50,100 $60,600 $551,500
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Administration in the Division
of Public Works is hereby reduced by $91,300 for capital outlay from the Per-
manent Building Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Administration is hereby increased by three (3.00) for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding Section 57-1108, Idaho Code, and any other
provision of law to the contrary, of the amount appropriated to the De-
partment of Administration for the Management Services Program from the
Permanent Building Fund, the Office of the State Controller shall transfer


$60,600 to the Governor's Residence Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon there-
after as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, to be
used for the Governor's housing stipend.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.